Nevada, session 83, AB497.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 294A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
A committee for political action may use money in the separate
account opened and maintained pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
294A.130 to:
1. Subject to the limitations set forth in NRS 294A.100, make
a contribution to a candidate;
2. Make a contribution to a legal defense fund;
3. Make a contribution to a nonprofit corporation;
4. Make a contribution to another committee for political
action;
5. Make a contribution to a committee for the recall of a
public officer;
6. Make a contribution to a political party or a committee
sponsored by a political party; or
7. Make any expenditure, including, without limitation, an
independent expenditure.
Sec. 2. NRS 294A.0055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.0055 1. “Committee for political action” means:
(a) Any group of natural persons or entities that solicits or
receives contributions from any other person, group or entity and:
(1) Makes or intends to make contributions to candidates or
other persons; or
(2) Makes or intends to make expenditures,
 designed to affect the outcome of any primary election, general
election, special election or question on the ballot.
(b) [Any] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
business or social organization, corporation, partnership,
association, trust [,] or unincorporated organization : [or labor
union:]
(1) Which has as its primary purpose affecting the outcome
of any primary election, general election, special election or any
question on the ballot and for that purpose receives contributions in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
excess of $1,500 in a calendar year or makes expenditures in excess
of $1,500 in a calendar year; or
(2) Which does not have as its primary purpose affecting the
outcome of any primary election, general election, special election
or any question on the ballot, but for the purpose of affecting the
outcome of any election or question on the ballot receives
contributions in excess of $5,000 in a calendar year or makes
independent expenditures in excess of $5,000 in a calendar year.
2. “Committee for political action” does not include:
(a) An organization made up of legislative members of a
political party whose primary purpose is to provide support for their
political efforts.
(b) An entity solely because it provides goods or services to a
candidate or committee in the regular course of its business at the
same price that would be provided to the general public.
(c) An individual natural person.
(d) [Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1, an] An individual corporation or other business organization who
has filed articles of incorporation or other documentation of
organization with the Secretary of State pursuant to title 7 of NRS.
(e) [Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of subsection
1, a] A labor union.
(f) A personal campaign committee or the personal
representative of a candidate who receives contributions or makes
expenditures that are reported as contributions or expenditures by
the candidate.
(g) A committee for the recall of a public officer.
(h) A major or minor political party or any committee sponsored
by a major or minor political party.
(i) Any nonprofit organization or nonprofit corporation duly
organized under federal law or under the laws of this State, any
other state, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United
States.
Sec. 3. NRS 294A.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.160 1. It is unlawful for:
(a) A candidate to spend money received as a contribution:
(1) For the candidate’s personal use; or
(2) To pay himself or herself a salary.
(b) A public officer to spend unspent contributions:
(1) For the public officer’s personal use; or
(2) To pay himself or herself a salary.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 294A.286, a
candidate or public officer may use contributions to pay for any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
legal expenses that the candidate or public officer incurs in relation
to a campaign or serving in public office without establishing a legal
defense fund. Any such candidate or public officer shall report any
expenditure of contributions to pay for legal expenses in the same
manner and at the same time as the report filed pursuant to NRS
294A.120 or 294A.200. A candidate or public officer shall not use
contributions to satisfy a civil or criminal penalty imposed by law.
3. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 5,] this section,
every candidate for office at a primary election, general election or
special election who is elected to that office and received
contributions that were not spent or committed for expenditure
before the primary election, general election or special election shall
dispose of the money through one or any combination of the
following methods:
(a) Return the unspent money to contributors;
(b) Use the money in the candidate’s next election or for the
payment of other expenses related to public office or his or her
campaign, regardless of whether he or she is a candidate for a
different office in the candidate’s next election;
(c) Contribute the money to:
(1) The campaigns of other candidates for public office or for
the payment of debts related to their campaigns;
(2) If the candidate was elected to the office of a Legislator,
another member of the Legislature who is authorized to solicit or
accept contributions pursuant to NRS 294A.117;
(3) A political party; or
(4) Any combination of persons or groups set forth in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3);
(d) Donate the money to any tax-exempt nonprofit entity; or
(e) Donate the money to any governmental entity or fund of this
State or a political subdivision of this State. A candidate who
donates money pursuant to this paragraph may request that the
money be used for a specific purpose.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, every
candidate for office at a primary election, general election or special
election who withdraws pursuant to NRS 293.202 or 293C.195 after
filing a declaration of candidacy [,] or is removed from the ballot by
court order [or is defeated for or otherwise not elected to that office]
and who received contributions that were not spent or committed for
expenditure before the primary election, general election or special
election shall, not later than the 15th day of the second month after
the election, dispose of the money through one or any combination
of the following methods:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(a) Return the unspent money to contributors;
(b) Contribute the money to:
(1) The campaigns of other candidates for public office or for
the payment of debts related to their campaigns;
(2) A political party; or
(3) Any combination of persons or groups set forth in
subparagraphs (1) and (2);
(c) Donate the money to any tax-exempt nonprofit entity; or
(d) Donate the money to any governmental entity or fund of this
State or a political subdivision of this State. A candidate who
donates money pursuant to this paragraph may request that the
money be used for a specific purpose.
5. Every candidate for office at a special election to recall a
public officer shall dispose of the unspent contributions through one
or any combination of the methods set forth in subsection 4 not later
than the 15th day of the second month following the last day for the
candidate to receive a contribution pursuant to NRS 294A.115.
6. Every candidate for office who withdraws after filing a
declaration of candidacy, is defeated for that office at a primary
election or is removed from the ballot by court order before a
primary election or general election and who received a contribution
from a person in excess of $5,000 shall, not later than the 15th day
of the second month after the primary election or general election,
as applicable, return any money in excess of $5,000 to the
contributor.
7. Except [for a former public officer who is subject to the
provisions of subsection 11, every person who qualifies as a] as
otherwise provided in this subsection, every candidate [by receiving
one or more qualifying contributions in excess of $100 but who,]
who appears on the ballot but is defeated at a primary election or
general election may use unspent contributions in the candidate’s
next election. Such a candidate is subject to the reporting
requirements set forth in NRS 294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128,
294A.200 and 294A.362 for as long as the candidate has unspent
contributions. If, within 4 years [after the date of receiving the first
of those qualifying contributions,] , the candidate does not:
(a) File a declaration of candidacy; or
(b) Appear on an official ballot at any election,
 the candidate shall, not later than the 15th day of the month after
the end of the 4-year period, dispose of all contributions that have
not been spent or committed for expenditure through one or any
combination of the methods set forth in subsection 4.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
8. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, every] Every
former public officer who [:
(a) Does not run for reelection to the office which he or she
holds;
(b) Is not a candidate for any other office and does not qualify as
a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100; and
(c) Has] has contributions that are not spent or committed for
expenditure remaining from a previous election [,
] shall, not later than [the 15th day of the second month] 15 days
after [the expiration of the public officer’s term of] the 4-year
period immediately following leaving office, dispose of those
contributions in the manner provided in subsection 4.
9. [Every public officer who:
(a) Resigns from his or her office;
(b) Is not a candidate for any other office and does not qualify as
a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100; and
(c) Has contributions that are not spent or committed for
expenditure remaining from a previous election,
 shall, not later than the 15th day of the second month after the
effective date of the resignation, dispose of those contributions in
the manner provided in subsection 4.
10. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 11, every
public officer who:
(a) Does not run for reelection to the office which he or she
holds or who resigns from his or her office;
(b) Is a candidate for any other office or qualifies as a candidate
by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in excess of $100;
and
(c) Has contributions that are not spent or committed for
expenditure remaining from a previous election,
 may use the unspent contributions in a future election. Such a
public officer is subject to the reporting requirements set forth in
NRS 294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128, 294A.200 and 294A.362 for
as long as the public officer is a candidate for any office or qualifies
as a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying contributions in
excess of $100.
11. Every former public officer described in subsection 10 who
qualifies as a candidate by receiving one or more qualifying
contributions in excess of $100 but who, within 4 years after the
date of receiving the first of those qualifying contributions, does not:
(a) File a declaration of candidacy; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(b) Appear on an official ballot at any election,
 shall, not later than the 15th day of the month after the end of the
4-year period, dispose of all contributions that have not been spent
or committed for expenditure through one or any combination of the
methods set forth in subsection 4.
12.] In addition to the methods for disposing of the unspent
money set forth in this section, a Legislator may donate not more
than $500 of that money to the Nevada Silver Haired Legislative
Forum created pursuant to NRS 427A.320.
[13.] 10. Any contributions received before a candidate for
office at a primary election, general election or special election dies
that were not spent or committed for expenditure before the death of
the candidate must be disposed of in the manner provided in
subsection 4.
[14.] 11. The court shall, in addition to any penalty which may
be imposed pursuant to NRS 294A.420, order the candidate or
public officer to dispose of any remaining contributions in the
manner provided in this section.
[15.] 12. As used in this section [:
(a) “Contribution”] , “contribution” includes, without
limitation, any interest and other income earned on a contribution.
[(b) “Qualifying contribution” means the receipt of a
contribution that causes a person to qualify as a candidate pursuant
to subsection 3 of NRS 294A.005.]
Sec. 3.5. NRS 294A.210 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
294A.210 1. The provisions of this section apply to:
(a) Every person who makes an independent expenditure in
excess of $1,000; [and]
(b) Every committee for political action, political party and
committee sponsored by a political party which receives
contributions in excess of $1,000 or makes an expenditure for or
against a candidate for office or a group of such candidates [.] ; and
(c) Every person that makes expenditures in excess of $1,000
designed to affect the outcome of any primary election, general
election or special election or question on the ballot and that is:
(1) An individual corporation or other business
organization that has filed articles of incorporation or other
documentation of organization with the Secretary of State
pursuant to title 7 of NRS;
(2) A nonprofit organization or nonprofit corporation duly
organized under federal law or under the laws of this State, any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
other state, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United
States; or
(3) A labor union.
2. Every person, committee and political party described in
subsection 1 shall, not later than January 15 of the election year, for
the period beginning January 1 of the previous year and ending on
December 31 of the previous year, report each independent
expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, made during the
period in excess of $1,000 and independent expenditures or other
expenditures, as applicable, made during the period to one recipient
which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
3. In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection 2,
every person, committee and political party described in subsection
1 shall, not later than:
(a) April 15 of the election year, for the period beginning
January 1 and ending on March 31 of the election year;
(b) July 15 of the election year, for the period beginning April 1
and ending on June 30 of the election year;
(c) October 15 of the election year, for the period beginning
July 1 and ending on September 30 of the election year; and
(d) January 15 of the year immediately following the election
year, for the period beginning October 1 and ending on
December 31 of the election year,
 report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the period and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7 and
NRS 294A.223, every person, committee and political party
described in subsection 1 which makes an independent expenditure
or other expenditure, as applicable, for or against a candidate for
office at a special election or for or against a group of such
candidates shall, not later than:
(a) Four days before the beginning of early voting by personal
appearance for the special election, for the period from the
nomination of the candidate through 5 days before the beginning of
early voting by personal appearance for the special election;
(b) Four days before the special election, for the period from 4
days before the beginning of early voting by personal appearance
for the special election through 5 days before the special election;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(c) Thirty days after the special election, for the remaining
period through the date of the special election,
 report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the period and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6 and 7 and
NRS 294A.223, every person, committee and political party
described in subsection 1 which makes an independent expenditure
or other expenditure, as applicable, for or against a candidate for
office at a special election to determine whether a public officer will
be recalled or for or against a group of such candidates shall, not
later than:
(a) Four days before the beginning of early voting by personal
appearance for the special election, for the period from the date the
notice of intent to circulate the petition for recall is filed pursuant to
NRS 306.015 through 5 days before the beginning of early voting
by personal appearance for the special election;
(b) Four days before the special election, for the period from 4
days before the beginning of early voting by personal appearance
for the special election through 5 days before the special election;
and
(c) Thirty days after the special election, for the remaining
period through the date of the special election,
 report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the period and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, if a petition
for recall is not submitted to the filing officer before the expiration
of the notice of intent pursuant to the provisions of chapter 306 of
NRS or is otherwise legally insufficient when submitted to the filing
officer pursuant to the provisions of that chapter, every person,
committee and political party described in subsection 1 which
makes an independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, for or against a candidate for office at a special election
to determine whether a public officer will be recalled or for or
against a group of such candidates shall, not later than 30 days after
the expiration of the notice of intent, for the period from the filing of
the notice of intent through the date that the notice of intent expires
or the petition is determined to be legally insufficient, report each of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
the campaign expenses described in subsection 1 incurred during the
period. The provisions of this subsection apply to the person,
committee and political party if the petition for recall:
(a) Is not submitted to the filing officer as required by chapter
306 of NRS;
(b) Is submitted to the filing officer without any valid signatures
or with fewer than the necessary number of valid signatures required
by chapter 306 of NRS; or
(c) Is otherwise legally insufficient or efforts to obtain the
necessary number of valid signatures required by chapter 306 of
NRS are suspended or discontinued.
7. If the legal sufficiency of a petition for recall is challenged
and a district court determines that the petition is legally:
(a) Sufficient pursuant to chapter 306 of NRS and the order of
the district court is appealed, every person, committee and political
party described in subsection 1 which makes an independent
expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, for or against a
candidate for office at a special election to determine whether a
public officer will be recalled or for or against a group of such
candidates shall:
(1) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the notice
of appeal is filed, for the period from the filing of the notice of
intent to circulate the petition for recall through the date on which
the notice of appeal is filed, report each independent expenditure or
other expenditure, as applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during
the period and independent expenditures or expenditures, as
applicable, made during the period to one recipient which
cumulatively exceed $1,000.
(2) Not later than 30 days after the date on which all appeals
regarding the petition are exhausted, for the period from the day
after the date on which the notice of appeal is filed through the date
on which all appeals regarding the petition are exhausted, report
each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, in
excess of $1,000 made during the period and independent
expenditures or expenditures, as applicable, made during the period
to one recipient which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
(b) Insufficient pursuant to chapter 306 of NRS, every person,
committee and political party described in subsection 1 which
makes an independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, for or against a candidate for office at a special election
to determine whether a public officer will be recalled or for or
against a group of such candidates shall:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(1) Not later than 30 days after the date on which the district
court orders the filing officer to cease any further proceedings
regarding the petition, for the period from the filing of the notice of
intent to circulate the petition for recall through the date of the
district court’s order, report each independent expenditure or other
expenditure, as applicable, in excess of $1,000 made during the
period and independent expenditures or expenditures, as applicable,
made during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000.
(2) Not later than 30 days after the date on which all appeals
regarding the petition are exhausted, for the period from the day
after the date of the district court’s order through the date on which
all appeals regarding the petition are exhausted, report each
independent expenditure or other expenditure, as applicable, in
excess of $1,000 made during the period and independent
expenditures or expenditures, as applicable, made during the period
to one recipient which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
8. In addition to complying with the applicable requirements of
subsections 2 to 7, inclusive, a person, committee or political party
described in subsection 1 must, not later than January 15 of each
year that is not an election year, for the period beginning January 1
of the previous year and ending on December 31 of the previous
year, report each independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, made during the period in excess of $1,000 and
independent expenditures or other expenditures, as applicable, made
during the period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed
$1,000. Nothing in this subsection:
(a) Requires the person, committee or political party to report
information that has previously been reported in a timely manner
pursuant to subsections 2 to 7, inclusive; or
(b) Authorizes the person, committee or political party to not
comply with any applicable requirement set forth in subsections 2 to
7, inclusive.
9. Independent expenditures and other expenditures made
within the State or made elsewhere but for use within the State,
including independent expenditures and other expenditures made
outside the State for printing, television and radio broadcasting or
other production of the media, must be included in the report.
10. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.3737, the
reports must be filed electronically with the Secretary of State.
11. If an independent expenditure or other expenditure, as
applicable, is made for or against a group of candidates, the reports
must be itemized by the candidate.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
12. A report shall be deemed to be filed on the date that it was
received by the Secretary of State. Every person, committee or
political party described in subsection 1 shall file a report required
by this section even if the person, committee or political party
receives no contributions.
Sec. 4. Any former public officer who on October 1, 2025, has
unspent contributions pursuant to the former provisions of
subsections 7 to 11, inclusive, of NRS 294A.160 as that section
existed on September 30, 2025, shall dispose of such unspent
contributions pursuant to NRS 294A.160, as amended by section 3
of this act, not later than October 1, 2029.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)